Florida, session 2026, SB1050.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 474.224, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 474.224âVeterinary prescription disclosure.â 26 (1)(a)âBefore dispensing a prescription medication, a 27 licensed veterinarian or an authorized member of the veterinary 28 staff must clearly inform a client of: 29 1.âThe clientâs right to receive a written prescription for 30 the medication that can be filled at the pharmacy of the 31 clientâs choice. 32 2.âIf the veterinary establishment is able to fill the 33 prescription, the option to have the prescription filled at the 34 veterinary establishment. 35 36 For purposes of this chapter, âwritten prescriptionâ includes 37 paper prescriptions delivered via manual transmission or 38 electronic prescriptions delivered via direct transmission to a 39 pharmacy. 40 (b)âEach disclosure required under this subsection shall be 41 made: 42 1.âVerbally, if the consultation with the client is in 43 person; or 44 2.âElectronically, if the consultation with the client is 45 through veterinary telehealth. 46 (c)âThe option chosen by the client under paragraph (a) 47 must be documented by the veterinarian or an authorized member 48 of the veterinary staff with a one-time acknowledgement that is 49 signed by the client and that states that the client is aware of 50 the options in paragraph (a). 51 1.âThe acknowledgement must be in substantially the 52 following form: 53 54 ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF ABILITY TO 55 RECEIVE WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION 56 I, ...(name of client)..., understand the veterinary clientâs 57 right to receive a written prescription for medication that can 58 be filled by the pharmacy of my choice or my veterinarian, as 59 provided in s. 474.224, Florida Statutes. 60 61 Signature:...(signature of applicant)...Date:...(date)... 62 63 2.âAn acknowledgment signed by a client under this section 64 shall be documented in the patientâs medical record. 65 3.âAn acknowledgement under this section may not make a 66 statement, notification, warning, or assumption regarding the 67 efficacy or safety of filling prescriptions through an outside 68 pharmacy. 69 (d)âA veterinary establishment shall post a clear and 70 conspicuous sign near the point of sale or where checkout occurs 71 which substantially states the following: 72 73 FLORIDA LAW GIVES THE VETERINARY CLIENT THE OPTION TO: 74 1.âRECEIVE A WRITTEN PRESCRIPTION FOR MEDICATION 75 THAT CAN BE FILLED AT THE PHARMACY OF YOUR CHOICE; OR 76 2.âHAVE YOUR PRESCRIPTION FILLED AT THE 77 VETERINARY ESTABLISHMENT, IF THE VETERINARY 78 ESTABLISHMENT IS ABLE TO FILL THE PRESCRIPTION. 79 80 (2)âThis section does not apply if: 81 (a)âImmediate dispensing of medication is necessary to 82 preserve life or prevent suffering; or 83 (b)âThe prescription is for a controlled substance, the 84 dispensing of which is restricted by federal or state law. 85 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.